Washington statutes.
RCW 2.70.901

Transfer of certain powers, duties, and functions of the department of social and health services—Persons not guilty by reason of insanity.

(1) All powers, duties, and functions of county government and the department of social and health services pertaining to public defense services for indigent persons who are committed following acquittal by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW are transferred to the office of public defense. County government and the department of social and health services shall retain powers, duties, and functions to ensure public defense services for indigent persons prior to acquittal by reason of insanity under chapter 10.77 RCW.

(2)(a) The office of public defense may request copies of records in the possession of a county public defense administrator, the department of social and health services, or the behavioral health administration pertaining to the powers, functions, and duties transferred, which shall be timely delivered to the custody of the office of public defense. In order to implement the office's administration and oversight of postcommitment public defense services authorized by chapter 120, Laws of 2023, the office of public defense shall be entitled to personal identifying information for any person committed following acquittal by reason of insanity, as well as information about underlying criminal or other pending court proceedings, and the identity of any existing legal counsel. The county public defense administrator, the department of social and health services, or the behavioral health administration shall not require the office of public defense to obtain consent by the person committed following acquittal by reason of insanity in order to share this information. The office of public defense shall maintain the confidentiality of all confidential information included in the records. Records may be transferred electronically or in hard copy, as agreed by the agencies. When the office of public defense has satisfied its business needs related to the transferred records, the office shall destroy the records following appropriate procedures.

(b) All funds, credits, or other assets held by the department of social and health services in connection with the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall be assigned to the office of public defense.

(c) Any appropriations made to the department of social and health services for carrying out the powers, functions, and duties transferred shall, on July 1, 2023, be transferred and credited to the office of public defense.

(3) Notwithstanding July 1, 2023, if implementation of office of public defense contracts would result in the substitution of counsel within 180 days of a scheduled hearing, the director of the office of public defense may continue defense services with existing counsel to facilitate continuity of effective representation and avoid further continuance of a trial. When existing counsel is maintained, payment to complete the trial shall be prorated based on standard contract fees established by the office of public defense under chapter 120, Laws of 2023 and, at the director's discretion, may include extraordinary compensation based on attorney documentation.

[ 2023 c 120 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2023 c 120: See notes following RCW 2.70.027.